Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3009
Civil Legal Services Fund; created; investment.

The Civil Legal Services Fund is created. Any money remaining in the fund at the end of a calendar year shall be distributed in the following calendar year. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2006, LB 746, § 5.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.